North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-10.1 Reciprocal Higher Education Agreements

15-10.1-01.
Declaration of legislative intent.

In order to make the most provident utilization of state institutions of higher education and private colleges in North Dakota, and public and private colleges and universities in contiguous states, and to avoid duplication of facilities, it is desirable to provide means which will enable a student resident within the areas served by such institutions of higher education to obtain desired courses in the most expedient manner and at the least possible cost.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 159, § 1.

Cross-References.

Contracts for medical education, see N.D.C.C. § 15-52-30.

Interstate agreements, see § 15-10-28.

Regional veterinary medical education program, see § 15-10-28.2.

15-10.1-01.1.
Legislative intent on reciprocity.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the board of higher education thoroughly investigate the possibility of entering into appropriate reciprocal agreements with the appropriate institutions in the states of South Dakota, Montana, and Minnesota, and that such agreements, if found feasible, be entered into by the board. It is further declared to be the intent of the legislative assembly that before entering into any such agreement which necessitates the expenditure of state funds, the state board of higher education return to the legislative assembly for approval of such expenditures.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 137, § 2.

15-10.1-02.
Agreements — Reciprocal basis.

The state board of higher education may enter into agreements with public or private institutions of higher education, or the governing boards thereof, in this state and in contiguous states on a reciprocal basis in order to accomplish the following:

To enable a student at any institution party to such an agreement to take a specialized course or courses at a different institution from that in which the student is enrolled, with or without the payment of tuition charges at the other institution.

To enable a student enrolled in any of the institutions party to the agreement to attend another institution party to such agreement without being required to pay nonresident tuition fees and in accordance with the terms of such agreement.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 159, § 2; 1999, ch. 161, § 2.

15-10.1-03.
Remission of nonresident tuition — Agreements.

The state board of higher education may enter into agreements for the remission of nonresident tuition for designated categories of students at state institutions of higher education. Such agreements must have as their purpose the mutual improvement of educational advantages for residents of this state and such other states or institutions of other states with whom agreements are made.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 159, § 3; 1999, ch. 161, § 3.

15-10.1-04.
Procedures — Limitations.

The state board of higher education may prescribe the procedures for carrying out the authority conferred by sections 15-10.1-02 and 15-10.1-03. An agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter must provide for approximately equal advantages between the contracting institutions or the contracting states.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 159, § 4; 1975, ch. 137, § 1.

15-10.1-05.
Supplementary authority.

The authority granted the state board of higher education by this chapter is supplemental to the authority granted such board by section 15-10-28.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 159, § 5.